Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB409.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 216B.015 is amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided, for purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall
apply:
(1) "Abortion facility" means any place in which an abortion is performed;
(2) "Administrative regulation" means a regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant
to the procedures in KRS Chapter 13A;
(3) "Affected persons" means the applicant; any person residing within the geographic
area served or to be served by the applicant; any person who regularly uses health
facilities within that geographic area; health facilities located in the health service
area in which the project is proposed to be located which provide services similar to
the services of the facility under review; health facilities which, prior to receipt by
the agency of the proposal being reviewed, have formally indicated an intention to
provide similar services in the future; and the cabinet and third-party payors who
reimburse health facilities for services in the health service area in which the project
is proposed to be located;
(4) (a) "Ambulatory surgical center" means a health facility:
1. Licensed pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the
cabinet;
2. That provides outpatient surgical services, excluding oral or dental
procedures; and
3. Seeking recognition and reimbursement as an ambulatory surgical center
from any federal, state, or third-party insurer from which payment is
sought.
(b) An ambulatory surgical center does not include the private offices of
physicians where in-office outpatient surgical procedures are performed as
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
long as the physician office does not seek licensure, certification,
reimbursement, or recognition as an ambulatory surgical center from a
federal, state, or third-party insurer.
(c) [Nothing in ]This subsection shall not preclude a physician from negotiating
enhanced payment for outpatient surgical procedures performed in the
physician's private office so long as the physician does not seek recognition or
reimbursement of his or her office as an ambulatory surgical center without
first obtaining a certificate of need or license required under KRS 216B.020
and 216B.061;
(5) "Applicant" means any physician's office requesting a major medical equipment
expenditure exceeding the capital expenditure minimum, or any person, health
facility, or health service requesting a certificate of need or license;
(6) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(7) "Capital expenditure" means an expenditure made by or on behalf of a health
facility which:
(a) Under generally accepted accounting principles is not properly chargeable as
an expense of operation and maintenance or is not for investment purposes
only; or
(b) Is made to obtain by lease or comparable arrangement any facility or part
thereof or any equipment for a facility or part thereof;
(8) "Capital expenditure minimum" means an expenditure amount of at least fifteen
million dollars ($15,000,000) adjusted by the cabinet for inflation annually by an
increased rate of change in the nonseasonally adjusted annual average
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All
Items, between the two (2) most recent calendar years available, as published by
the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. The cabinet shall not decrease the
capital expenditure minimum[the annually adjusted amount set by the cabinet]. In
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
determining whether an expenditure exceeds the capital expenditure minimum, the
cost of any studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, and
other activities essential to the improvement, expansion, or replacement of any
plant or any equipment with respect to which the expenditure is made shall be
included. Donations of equipment or facilities to a health facility which if acquired
directly by the facility would be subject to review under this chapter shall be
considered a capital expenditure, and a transfer of the equipment or facilities for
less than fair market value shall be considered a capital expenditure if a transfer of
the equipment or facilities at fair market value would be subject to review;
(9) "Certificate of need" means an authorization by the cabinet to acquire, to establish,
to offer, to substantially change the bed capacity, or to substantially change a health
service as covered by this chapter;
(10) "Certified surgical assistant" means a certified surgical assistant or certified first
assistant who is certified by the National Surgical Assistant Association on the
Certification of Surgical Assistants, the Liaison Council on Certification of Surgical
Technologists, or the American Board of Surgical Assistants. The certified surgical
assistant is an unlicensed health-care provider who is directly accountable to a
physician licensed under KRS Chapter 311 or, in the absence of a physician, to a
registered nurse licensed under KRS Chapter 314;
(11) "Continuing care retirement community" means a community that provides, on the
same campus, a continuum of residential living options and support services to
persons sixty (60) years of age or older under a written agreement. The residential
living options shall include independent living units, nursing home beds, and either
assisted living units or personal care beds;
(12) "Formal review process" means the ninety (90) day certificate-of-need review
conducted by the cabinet;
(13) "Health facility" means any institution, place, building, agency, or portion thereof,
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
public or private, whether organized for profit or not, used, operated, or designed to
provide medical diagnosis, treatment, nursing, rehabilitative, or preventive care and
includes alcohol abuse, drug abuse, and mental health services. This shall include
but[ shall] not be limited to health facilities and health services commonly referred
to as hospitals, psychiatric hospitals, physical rehabilitation hospitals, chemical
dependency programs, nursing facilities, nursing homes, personal care homes,
intermediate care facilities, assisted living communities, family care homes,
outpatient clinics, ambulatory care facilities, ambulatory surgical centers,
emergency care centers and services, ambulance providers, hospices, community
mental health centers, home health agencies, kidney disease treatment centers and
freestanding hemodialysis units, freestanding birthing centers as defined in KRS
216B.198, and others providing similarly organized services regardless of
nomenclature;
(14) "Health services" means clinically related services provided within the
Commonwealth to two (2) or more persons, including but not limited to diagnostic,
treatment, or rehabilitative services, and includes alcohol, drug abuse, and mental
health services;
(15) "Independent living" means the provision of living units and supportive services,
including but not limited to laundry, housekeeping, maintenance, activity direction,
security, dining options, and transportation;
(16) "Intraoperative surgical care" includes the practice of surgical assisting in which the
certified surgical assistant or physician assistant is working under the direction of
the operating physician as a first or second assist, and which may include the
following procedures:
(a) Positioning the patient;
(b) Preparing and draping the patient for the operative procedure;
(c) Observing the operative site during the operative procedure;
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
(d) Providing the best possible exposure of the anatomy incident to the operative
procedure;
(e) Assisting in closure of incisions and wound dressings; and
(f) Performing any task, within the role of an unlicensed assistive person, or if
the assistant is a physician assistant, performing any task within the role of a
physician assistant, as required by the operating physician incident to the
particular procedure being performed;
(17) "Major medical equipment" means equipment which is used for the provision of
medical and other health services and which costs in excess of the medical
equipment expenditure minimum. In determining whether medical equipment has a
value in excess of the medical equipment expenditure minimum, the value of
studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, and other
activities essential to the acquisition of the equipment shall be included;
(18) "Major medical equipment expenditure minimum" means an expenditure
amount of at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) adjusted by the cabinet for
inflation annually by an increased rate of change in the nonseasonally adjusted
annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S.
City Average, All Items, between the two (2) most recent calendar years available,
as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, except that the
cabinet shall not decrease the major medical equipment expenditure minimum;
(19)[(18)] "Nonsubstantive review" means an expedited review conducted by the cabinet
of an application for a certificate of need as authorized under KRS 216B.095;
(20)[(19)] "Nonclinically related expenditures" means expenditures for:
(a) Repairs, renovations, alterations, and improvements to the physical plant of a
health facility which do not result in a substantial change in beds, a substantial
change in a health service, or the addition of major medical equipment, and do
not constitute the replacement or relocation of a health facility; or
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
(b) Projects which do not involve the provision of direct clinical patient care,
including but not limited to the following:
1. Parking facilities;
2. Telecommunications or telephone systems;
3. Management information systems;
4. Ventilation systems;
5. Heating or air conditioning, or both;
6. Energy conservation; or
7. Administrative offices;
(21)[(20)] "Party to the proceedings" means the applicant for a certificate of need and
any affected person who appears at a hearing on the matter under consideration and
enters an appearance of record;
(22)[(21)] "Perioperative nursing" means a practice of nursing in which the nurse
provides preoperative, intraoperative, and postoperative nursing care to surgical
patients;
(23)[(22)] "Person" means an individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a corporation, an
association, a group, state, or political subdivision or instrumentality including a
municipal corporation of a state;
(24)[(23)] "Physician assistant" means the same as the definition provided in KRS
311.550;
(25)[(24)] "Record" means, as applicable in a particular proceeding:
(a) The application and any information provided by the applicant at the request
of the cabinet;
(b) Any information provided by a holder of a certificate of need or license in
response to a notice of revocation of a certificate of need or license;
(c) Any memoranda or documents prepared by or for the cabinet regarding the
matter under review which were introduced at any hearing;
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
(d) Any staff reports or recommendations prepared by or for the cabinet;
(e) Any recommendation or decision of the cabinet;
(f) Any testimony or documentary evidence adduced at a hearing;
(g) The findings of fact and opinions of the cabinet or the findings of fact and
recommendation of the hearing officer; and
(h) Any other items required by administrative regulations promulgated by the
cabinet;
(26)[(25)] "Registered nurse first assistant" means one who:
(a) Holds a current active registered nurse licensure;
(b) Is certified in perioperative nursing; and
(c) Has successfully completed and holds a degree or certificate from a
recognized program, which shall consist of:
1. The Association of Operating Room Nurses, Inc., Core Curriculum for
the registered nurse first assistant; and
2. One (1) year of postbasic nursing study, which shall include at least
forty-five (45) hours of didactic instruction and one hundred twenty
(120) hours of clinical internship or its equivalent of two (2) college
semesters.
A registered nurse who was certified prior to 1995 by the Certification Board of
Perioperative Nursing shall not be required to fulfill the requirements of paragraph
(c) of this subsection;
(27)[(26)] "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services;
(28)[(27)] "Sexual assault examination facility" means a licensed health facility,
emergency medical facility, primary care center, or a children's advocacy center or
rape crisis center that is regulated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
and that provides sexual assault examinations under KRS 216B.400;
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
(29)[(28)] "State health plan" means the document prepared triennially, updated
annually, and approved by the Governor;
(30)[(29)] "Substantial change in a health service" means:
(a) The addition of a health service for which there are review criteria and
standards in the state health plan; or
(b) The addition of a health service subject to licensure under this chapter;
(31)[(30)] "Substantial change in bed capacity" means the addition or reduction of beds
by licensure classification within a health facility;
(32)[(31)] "Substantial change in a project" means a change made to a pending or
approved project which results in:
(a) A substantial change in a health service, except a reduction or termination of a
health service;
(b) A substantial change in bed capacity, except for reductions;
(c) A change of location; or
(d) An increase in costs greater than the allowable amount as prescribed by
regulation;
(33)[(32)] "To acquire" means to obtain from another by purchase, transfer, lease, or
other comparable arrangement of the controlling interest of a capital asset or capital
stock, or voting rights of a corporation. An acquisition shall be deemed to occur
when more than fifty percent (50%) of an existing capital asset or capital stock or
voting rights of a corporation is purchased, transferred, leased, or acquired by
comparable arrangement by one (1) person from another person;
(34)[(33)] "To batch" means to review in the same review cycle and, if applicable, give
comparative consideration to all filed applications pertaining to similar types of
services, facilities, or equipment affecting the same health service area;
(35)[(34)] "To establish" means to construct, develop, or initiate a health facility;
(36)[(35)] "To obligate" means to enter any enforceable contract for the construction,
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
acquisition, lease, or financing of a capital asset. A contract shall be considered
enforceable when all contingencies and conditions in the contract have been met.
An option to purchase or lease which is not binding shall not be considered an
enforceable contract; and
(37)[(36)] "To offer" means, when used in connection with health services, to hold a
health facility out as capable of providing, or as having the means of providing,
specified health services.
Section 2. KRS 216B.061 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, a[no] person shall not do any of the
following without first obtaining a certificate of need:
(a) Establish a health facility if establishing it will cost more than the capital
expenditure minimum;
(b) [Obligate a capital expenditure which exceeds the capital expenditure
minimum;
(c) ]Make a substantial change in the bed capacity of a health facility if the
change will cost more than the capital expenditure minimum;
(c)[(d)] Make a substantial change in a health service if the change will cost
more than the capital expenditure minimum;
(d)[(e)] Make a substantial change in a project if the change will increase the
cost of the project by more than ten percent (10%);
(e)[(f)] Acquire major medical equipment if the acquisition will cost more than
the major medical equipment expenditure minimum;
(f)[(g)] Alter a geographical area or alter a specific location which has been
designated on a certificate of need or license; or
(g)[(h)] Transfer an approved certificate of need for the establishment of a new
health facility or the replacement of a licensed facility.
(2) A[No] person shall not separate portions of a single project into components in
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 976
order to evade any expenditure minimum set forth in this chapter. For purposes of
this chapter, the acquisition of one (1) or more items of functionally related
diagnostic or therapeutic equipment shall be considered as one (1) project.
(3) A[No] person shall not have ex parte contact with the final-decision-making
authority engaged in certificate of need activities regarding a certificate-of-need
application from the commencement of the review cycle to the final decision. If an
ex parte contact occurs, it shall be promptly made a part of the record.
(4) A[No] person shall not obligate a capital expenditure in excess of the amount
authorized by an existing certificate of need unless the person has received an
administrative escalation from the cabinet as prescribed by regulation.
(5) A[No] person shall not proceed to obligate a capital expenditure under an approved
certificate of need if there has been a substantial change in the project.
(6) A certificate of need shall be issued for a specific location and, when applicable, for
a designated geographical area.
(7) A[No] person shall not establish an ambulatory surgical center as defined in KRS
216B.015 without obtaining a certificate of need. An ambulatory surgical center
shall require a certificate of need and license, notwithstanding any exemption
contained in KRS 216B.020.
(8) [Nothing in ]This chapter shall not be interpreted to require any ambulatory surgical
center licensed as of July 12, 2012, to obtain a certificate of need to continue
operations and exercise all of the rights of a licensed health care facility, regardless
of whether it obtained a certificate of need before being licensed.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 9/29/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed